Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1591
Low-level radioactive waste, defined.

Low-level radioactive waste shall mean radioactive waste not classified as high-level radioactive waste, spent nuclear fuel, or byproduct material as defined in subdivision (2) of section 81-1582 and classified by the federal government as low-level radioactive waste but shall not include waste which remains a federal responsibility as designated in section 3(b) of the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Policy Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 2021C(b).

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 14;

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 5.